Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1970
Number of directors.

(a) A board of directors must consist of three or more individuals, with the number specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles or bylaws.

(b) The number of directors may be increased or decreased (but to no fewer than three) from time to time by amendment to or in the manner prescribed in the articles or bylaws.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 70.